Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 19 Arborists

2-19-1.
Practices subject to chapter.

The term arborist as used in this chapter means any person, firm or corporation who makes a business or practice of pruning, trimming, spraying or repairing fruit, shade and ornamental trees, and includes any lines of work that are commonly included under
the terms tree surgery, tree dentistry, tree spraying, tree pruning, and the work of foresters and entomologists as applied to the care of fruit, shade, forest and ornamental trees and shrubs. The provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation established in chapter 23-19.

History of Section. P.L. 1928, ch. 1203, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 227, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-19-1

; P.L. 2013, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 482, § 1.

2-19-2.
Issuance of license — Fee.

Any person, firm or corporation desiring to engage in or practice the art or trade of arborist, as defined in §

2-19-1

, shall obtain a license to engage or practice from the director of environmental management. The director is authorized to grant licenses to practice that art or trade and require that the applicant for the license pass
an examination showing fitness to engage in that art or trade, and the director shall charge a fee as determined by regulation as authorized in §

2-10-3.1

. This fee shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section. P.L. 1928, ch. 1203, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 227, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-19-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 6.

2-19-3.
Rules and regulations — Examination for license.

The director of the department of environmental management is authorized to make rules and regulations governing the practice of arborists and shall demand any person, firm, or corporation desiring to engage in the art or trade of treating and caring
for trees as defined in §

2-19-1

, that he, she, or it pass an examination to show his, her, or its ability or capability to practice the art or trade of arborist. The director is further authorized to make rules and regulations to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, including rules and regulations governing mulching operations and arboriculture operations as those terms are defined in §

2-19-4.1

.

History of Section. P.L. 1928, ch. 1203, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 227, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-19-3

; P.L. 2013, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 2.

2-19-4.
Disposition of license fees.

One-fifth (1/5) of all funds collected for licensing in this chapter shall, by the director of environmental management, be paid over to the general treasurer and deposited within the general fund, and four-fifths (4/5) of the funds collected shall be
deposited in the state forestry fund as provided for in §

2-10-3

.

History of Section. P.L. 1928, ch. 1203, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 227, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-19-4

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 6.

2-19-4.1.
Arboriculture and mulching operations defined.

As used in this chapter:

“Arboriculture” means the business or practice of pruning, trimming, spraying or repairing fruit, shade and ornamental trees, and includes any lines of work that are commonly included under the terms tree surgery, tree dentistry, tree spraying, tree pruning,
and the work of foresters and entomologists as applied to the care of fruit, shade, forest and ornamental trees and shrubs.

“Mulch” means any type of forest material, vegetative matter resulting from landscaping maintenance or land clearing operations and includes materials such as tree and shrub trimmings, tree and shrub roots, tree trunks, branches, leaves and tree stumps,
that is produced for the purpose of spreading or application over the surface of the soil as a protective cover, to retain moisture, reduce erosion, provide nutrients, and suppress weed growth, seed germination and for
general landscaping purposes.

“Mulching operation” means any commercial enterprise operating on at least five (5) contiguous acres or larger, which is owned or operated by a licensed arborist pursuant to this chapter, and has as its primary purpose the production or storage of mulch.

“Arboriculture operations” means any commercial enterprise operating on at least five (5) contiguous acres or larger, which is owned or operated by a licensed arborist pursuant to this chapter, and has as its primary purpose arboriculture.

Arboriculture operations and mulching operations shall be subject to the requirements of chapter 2-15.

History of Section.
P.L. 2013, ch. 451, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 482, § 2.

2-19-4.2.
Nuisance actions against arboriculture operations or mulching operations.

No arboriculture operation or mulching operation, as defined in this chapter may be found to be a public or private nuisance, due to alleged objectionable:

Noise from equipment used in normal, generally accepted arboriculture or mulching operations;

Dust created from normal, generally accepted arboriculture or mulching operations;

Use of pesticides, rodenticides, insecticides, herbicides, or fungicides.

This provision pertains only to nuisance actions under chapter 1 of title 10.

No rule or regulation of the department of transportation shall be enforced against any arboriculture operation or mulching operation to prevent it from placing a seasonal directional sign or display on the state’s right-of-way, on the condition that
said sign or display conforms with the local zoning ordinance, and that sign or display is promptly removed by the arboriculture operation or mulching operation upon the conclusion of the season for which said sign or display was
placed.

The provisions of this section do not apply to arboriculture operations or mulching operations that operate in a malicious or negligent manner, or that conduct operations in violation of federal or state law.

History of Section.
P.L. 2013, ch. 451, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 482, § 2.

2-19-5.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation who falsely represents that he or she holds an arborist license provided for in this chapter or who violates any other provision of this chapter, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section. P.L. 1928, ch. 1203, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 227, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-19-5

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 6.